Nevada, session 83, SB330.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 449.0039 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
449.0039 1. “Facility for skilled nursing” means an
establishment which provides inpatient continuous skilled nursing
and related care as prescribed by a physician to a patient in the
facility who is not in an acute episode of illness and whose primary
need is the availability of such care on a continuous basis.
2. “Facility for skilled nursing” does not include a facility
which meets the requirements of a general or any other special
hospital.
Sec. 2. NRS 244.3549 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.3549 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2
and 3, each board of county commissioners shall adopt an ordinance
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
using the following terms to describe the following types of
facilities, homes, houses and institutions:
(a) Child care institution, as that term is used in
NRS 432A.0245.
(b) Facility for transitional living for released offenders, as that
term is used in NRS 449.0055.
(c) Group foster home, as that term is used in NRS 424.015.
(d) Home for individual residential care, as that term is used in
NRS 449.0105.
(e) Recovery house for persons recovering from alcohol or other
substance use disorders, as that term is defined in NRS 278.02374.
(f) Residential facility for groups, as that term is used in
NRS 449.017.
(g) Facility for skilled nursing, as that term is used in
NRS 449.0039.
2. Subsection 1 requires the board of county commissioners to
use the specified terms solely for the purpose of referring to the
named facilities, homes, houses and institutions and does not require
the board to adopt the State’s definition for the purpose of regulating
or imposing any requirement with respect to such a facility, home,
house or institution.
3. A board of county commissioners is not required to include
a term set forth in subsection 1 in the ordinance if:
(a) A facility, home, house or institution of the type
corresponding to the term does not exist in the county; or
(b) The county’s ordinances do not otherwise, by whatever
name, refer to a facility, home, house or institution of the type
corresponding to the term.
Sec. 3. NRS 268.0193 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.0193 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2
and 3, the governing body of each city shall adopt an ordinance
using the following terms to describe the following types of
facilities, homes, houses and institutions:
(a) Child care institution, as that term is used in
NRS 432A.0245.
(b) Facility for transitional living for released offenders, as that
term is used in NRS 449.0055.
(c) Group foster home, as that term is used in NRS 424.015.
(d) Home for individual residential care, as that term is used in
NRS 449.0105.
(e) Recovery house for persons recovering from alcohol or other
substance use disorders, as that term is used in NRS 278.02374.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(f) Residential facility for groups, as that term is used in
NRS 449.017.
(g) Facility for skilled nursing, as that term is used in
NRS 449.0039.
2. Subsection 1 requires the governing body of the city to use
the specified terms solely for the purpose of referring to the named
facilities, homes, houses and institutions and does not require the
governing body to use the State’s definition for the purpose of
regulating or imposing any requirement with respect to such a
facility, home, house or institution.
3. The governing body of a city is not required to include a
term set forth in subsection 1 in the ordinance if:
(a) A facility, home, house or institution of the type
corresponding to the term does not exist in the city; or
(b) The city’s ordinances do not otherwise, by whatever name,
refer to a facility, home, house or institution of the type
corresponding to the term.
Sec. 4. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of sections
2 and 3 of this act, any facility operating on June 30, 2025, that is
considered a facility for skilled nursing, nursing home or similar
facility under an ordinance adopted by a board of county
commissioners or the governing body of a city on or before that date
shall be deemed to be a facility for skilled nursing for all purposes
under any ordinance adopted on or after July 1, 2025, by:
1. A board of county commissioners pursuant to paragraph (g)
of subsection 1 of NRS 244.3549, as amended by section 2 of this
act; or
2. The governing body of a city pursuant to paragraph (g) of
subsection 1 of NRS 268.0193, as amended by section 3 of this act.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)